Utah statutes.
20A-16-201.   Duties of lieutenant governor.

The lieutenant governor shall:

(1)  implement this chapter and the state's responsibilities under the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1973ff et seq.;

(2)  make available to covered voters information regarding voter registration procedures for covered voters and procedures for casting military-overseas ballots;

(3)  establish an electronic transmission system through which a covered voter may apply for and receive voter registration materials, military-overseas ballots, and other information under this chapter;

(4) (a)  develop standardized absentee-voting materials, including privacy and transmission envelopes and electronic equivalents of the envelopes, authentication materials, and voting instructions, to be used with the military-overseas ballot of a voter authorized to vote in any jurisdiction in the state; and

(b)  to the extent reasonably possible, coordinate with other states on the development required by Subsection (4)(a); and

(5)  prescribe the form and content of a declaration:

(a)  for use by a covered voter to swear or affirm specific representations pertaining to the voter's identity, eligibility to vote, status as a covered voter, and timely and proper completion of an overseas-military ballot;

(b)  that is based on the declaration prescribed to accompany a federal write-in absentee ballot, as modified to be consistent with this chapter; and

(c)  that is a prominent part of all balloting materials for which the declaration is required, including an indication of the date of execution of the declaration.



Enacted by Chapter 327, 2011 General Session

